District of Columbia statutes.
29-1302.01

Corporate purposes.

(a)

A benefit corporation shall have a purpose of creating general public benefit. This purpose is in addition to its purpose under § 29-303.01.

(b)

The articles of incorporation of a benefit corporation may identify one or more specific public benefits that it is the purpose of the benefit corporation to create in addition to its purposes under § 29-303.01 and subsection (a) of this section. The identification of a specific public benefit under this subsection does not limit the obligation of a benefit corporation under subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The creation of general public benefit and specific public benefit under subsections (a) and (b) of this section is in the best interests of the benefit corporation.

(d)

A benefit corporation may amend its articles of incorporation to add, amend, or delete the identification of a specific public benefit for that benefit corporation. To be effective, the amendment must be adopted by at least the minimum status vote.

(e)

A professional corporation that is a benefit corporation does not violate § 29-505 by having its purpose be to create general public benefit or a specific public benefit.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2735